test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv32_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: mýri
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: mýri
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: mýri
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: mýrar
    mýri+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: mýrar
    mýri+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: mýrum
    mýri+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: mýra
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: mýrin
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: mýrina
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: mýrini
    mýri+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: mýrarinnar
    mýri+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: mýrarnar
    mýri+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: mýrunum
    mýri+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: mýranna
